Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each year, the Department of Transportation shall determine the
amount of funding allocated under ORS 367.095 (4)(b) that is necessary to fund:
(a) Transportation projects specified by the Legislative Assembly by law;
(b) The matching moneys needed to spend federal funds;
(c) Highway maintenance activities;
(d) Programs that are more efficient to operate using state moneys; and
(e) Other purposes for which federal funds cannot be used.
(2) From state moneys described under ORS 367.095 (4)(b)  remaining after setting aside
the funds necessary to meet the purposes described in subsection (1) of  this section, the
department shall allocate to local governments $35 million per year.
(3) The department shall replace any state funds made available  to local governments
under subsection (2)  of this section with federal surface transportation funding on a dollar
for dollar basis.
(4)(a) The  department shall allocate the state moneys described in ORS 367.095 (4)(b)
under subsection (2) of this section to the following:
(A) Counties;
(B) Cities with a population of 5,000 or more and  located outside the boundaries of a
metropolitan planning organization, as defined in ORS 197.629;
(C) Metropolitan planning organizations in urbanized areas with a population of less than
200,000;
(D) The League of Oregon Cities; or
(E) The Association of Oregon Counties.
(b) Moneys allocated under this subsection shall be used solely  for uses that are con-
sistent with Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution.
(c) The distribution of moneys under this subsection shall be:
(A) Determined by agreement between the department, the League  of Oregon Cities and
the Association of Oregon Counties; and
(B) Provided to recipients through guidelines developed by the department.
(5) If less than $35 million of state moneys is allocated to  local governments under sub-
section (2) of this section in a year,  the department shall, to the extent possible, allocate,
under subsection (4) of this section, federal  surface transportation funding in an amount
Enrolled House Bill 2101 (HB 2101-A) Page 1
equal to the difference between $35 million and the  amount of state moneys allocated to local
governments under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House May 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2101 (HB 2101-A) Page 2